Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 6. Communication Interception

§§ 7-3-601 through 7-3-611.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 140, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see article 7 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 121, § 1, related to the interception or disclosure of wire, oral and electronic communications.